Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2130
Trespass; liability; damages; when recoverable.

For willful trespass, injuring any timber, tree, or shrub on the land of another, or in the street or highway in front of another's cultivated ground, yard, or town lot, or on the public grounds of any town, or any land held by this state, for any purpose whatever, the trespasser shall pay damages at the suit of any person entitled to protect or enjoy the property aforesaid.

R.S.1867, Code § 636, p. 506;

R.S.1913, § 8247;

C.S.1922, § 9200;

C.S.1929, § 20-2132;

R.S.1943, § 25-2130;

Laws 2000, LB 626, § 20.

To recover multiple damages one must distinctly claim them in his petition. George Rose Sodding & Grading Co., Inc. v. City of Omaha, 190 Neb. 12, 205 N.W.2d 655 (1973).

To constitute willful trespass, act must be done knowingly or intentionally. Hallowell v. Borchers, 150 Neb. 322, 34 N.W.2d 404 (1948).

Waste defined; equity will restrain. Hayman v. Rownd, 82 Neb. 598, 118 N.W. 328 (1908).

Injunction to restrain threatened trespass is allowable. Peterson v. Hopewell, 55 Neb. 670, 76 N.W. 451 (1898).

Entry of homesteader is sufficient to support action. Culbertson Irrigating & Water Power Co. v. Olander, 51 Neb. 539, 71 N.W. 298 (1897).